src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Class 12 Feist 163
LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_ab
+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+Comp:»ab SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ab SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+Comp:»ab PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»ba SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»best SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»b SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»b PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»õʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»õbâst SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»õb SG-COM_IN ;
+Comp:»õb PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»õbâ ESS/PAR ;
+Comp+Ess:»ben K ;

LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb
+Comp+Attr:»ääb # ;
+Comp:»ääb SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ääb SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»uʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»ubust SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»ubu SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»ubu ESS/PAR ;

!! Sammallahti 2010: 151
LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab
+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+Comp:»ab SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ab SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+Comp:»ab PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»õʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»uʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»õbâst SG-LOC ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubust SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»õb SG-COM_IN ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu SG-COM_IN ;
+Comp:»õb PL-OBL ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»õbâ ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu ESS/PAR ;

LEXICON ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus
+Der/ummus+Superl+Attr:»ummus # ;
+Der/ummus+Superl:»ummus NMN_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
+Der/umus+Superl+Attr:»umus # ;
+Der/umus+Superl:»umus NMN_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;


LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-mos
+Der/mõs+Superl:»mõs # ; 

LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-mus
+Der/mus+Superl:»mus # ; 
LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-ummus
+Der/ummus+Superl:»ummus # ; 

LEXICON AdjNom-as
+Attr+Sg+Gen:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Sg+Acc:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Sg+Ill:%>sa # ;
+Attr+Sg+Loc:%>sest # ;
+Attr+Sg+Com:%>sin # ;
+Attr+Ess:%>sen # ;
+Attr+Par:%>sed # ; 
+Attr+Sg+Abe:%>âztää # ;
+Attr+Pl+Nom:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Pl+Gen:%>si # ;
+Attr+Pl+Acc:%>sid # ;
+Attr+Pl+Ill:%>sid # ;
+Attr+Pl+Loc:%>sin # ;
+Attr+Pl+Com:%>sivuiʹm # ;
+Attr+Pl+Abe:%>sitää # ;


LEXICON a217  !!= * __@CODE@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 17 adj
+A+Sg+Nom:ai # ;
+A+Sg+Gen:ai # ;
+A+Sg+Acc:ai # ;
+A+Sg+Ill:ja K ;
+A+Sg+Loc:jest K ;
+A+Sg+Com:jin K ;
+A+Ess:jen K ;
+A+Par:jed K ;
+A+Sg+Abe:aitää K ;

LEXICON a23	  !!= * __@CODE@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 23 adj
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON a24	  !!= * __@CODE@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 24 adj
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON a27	  !!= * __@CODE@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 27 adj
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON LAZ
+A+Sg+Nom:ž # ;


LEXICON SAZ
+A+Sg+Nom:ž # ;

!! N›A derivation in +Der/N2A
LEXICON N2A_LUÕʹSSI
!! 1A (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+A+Sg+Nom:%>i K ;
+A+Attr:%>es K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>i K ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON N2A_REÄBǮǮAI
!! 1B (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai K ;
+A+Attr:%>as K ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

!!+Der/N2A: N2A_ČÄCCAI ;                !!N»A: 
LEXICON N2A_ČÄCCAI
!! 1C (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai K ;
+A+Attr:%>as K ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
